fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-ayapiy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ayapiy - ok : # -m animate noun, net AEW NA2
     ayapiy+N+A+Sg: ayapiy
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitayapiy
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kitayapiy
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitayapînân
     ayapiy+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: kitayapînaw
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kitayapîwâw

     ayapiy+N+A+Pl: ayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kitayapiyak
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nitayapînânak
     ayapiy+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: kitayapînawak
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kitayapîwâwak
     
     ayapiy+N+A+Obv: ayapiya
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitayapiya
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kitayapiya
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nitayapînâna
     ayapiy+N+A+Px21Pl+Obv: kitayapînawa
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kitayapîwâwa
     ayapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otayapiya
     ayapiy+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: otayapîwâwa
     ayapiy+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: otayapîyiwa
     
     ayapiy+N+A+Loc: ayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: nitayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kitayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: nitayapînâhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px21Pl+Loc: kitayapînâhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kitayapîwâhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: otayapîhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: otayapîwâhk
     ayapiy+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otayapîyihk

     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [ayapîs, ayapîsis]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicayapîs, nicayapîsis]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kicayapîs, kicayapîsis]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nicayapîsinân, nicayapîsisinân]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Sg: [kicayapîsinaw, kicayapîsisinaw]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kicayapîsiwâw, kicayapîsisiwâw]



     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [ayapîsak, ayapîsisak]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nicayapîsak, nicayapîsisak]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kicayapîsak, kicayapîsisak]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nicayapîsinânak, nicayapîsisinânak]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px21Pl+Pl: [kicayapîsinawak, kicayapîsisinawak]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kicayapîsiwâwak, kicayapîsisiwâwak]
     
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [ocayapîsa, ocayapîsisa]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [ocayapîsiwâwa, ocayapîsisiwâwa]
     ayapiy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: [ocayapîsiyiwa, ocayapîsisiyiwa]
